Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1004
Benefits; entitled, when.

Before any firefighter is entitled to benefits under the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act, such firefighter shall (1) have successfully passed a physical examination which failed to reveal any evidence of cancer, (2) have served at least twenty-four consecutive months as a firefighter at any fire station within the State of Nebraska, (3) have been actively engaged in fire suppression at an actual fire or fire training event, and (4) wear all available personal protective equipment when fighting any fire, including a self-contained breathing apparatus when fighting structure fires. After serving at least twenty-four consecutive months as a firefighter, the firefighter shall be deemed to be in compliance with subdivision (2) of this section even with a break in service, so long as such break does not exceed six months.

Laws 2021, LB432, § 3.